Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 7

Subscription to Railroad Stock by Counties and Municipalities

65-7-101. Power of locality to become stockholder.

Any county, incorporated city, or town may become a stockholder in any railroad company incorporated under the general laws of this state, to an amount not exceeding, in the aggregate, one-tenth (1/10) of its taxable property, by complying with the requirements of this chapter.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 1; Shan., § 1558; Code 1932, § 2612; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-701.

Cross-References. Rights as stockholders, § 65-7-116.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, §§ 2-7.

65-7-102. Right to subscribe to stock.

No county, incorporated city, or town shall subscribe to the capital stock of any railroad company under this chapter unless its railroad runs through the county or within one (1) mile of the incorporated city or town making the subscription; provided, that any county within which the railroad or any of its branches terminates may subscribe under this chapter.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 2; Shan., § 1559; Code 1932, § 2613; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-702.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, § 4.

65-7-103. Conditions precedent to subscription.

Before any county makes any subscription under this chapter, the president, or other authorized officer or agent of the railroad company, shall submit to the county mayor an application in the name of the company, setting forth the proposed termini of its railroad, the amount of the subscription asked for, the time within which its road will be constructed through the county, and that the application is made under this chapter, and the same shall be accompanied by a plan or map, certified by the chief engineer of the company, showing the general direction and line of its railroad in the county.

Before an incorporated city or town shall make any subscription under this chapter, such application must be submitted to its mayor or chief executive officer, showing the proposed termini of its railroad, accompanied with the declaration, on the part of the company, that it will locate and construct its railroad within one (1) mile of such incorporated city or town, within such time as shall be fixed in the application.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 3; Shan., § 1560; Code 1932, § 2614; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-703.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, § 7.

65-7-104. Record of application, plan, and amount — Ordering of election.

The county legislative body, or board of mayor and aldermen, or other governing body, as the case may be, shall spread upon its records the application and accompanying plan or map or declaration, and the amount to be voted upon by the people, and shall have full power to order such elections according to the laws regulating elections in this state.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 5; Shan., § 1563; Code 1932, § 2617; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-704.

65-7-105. County election on question — Order by legislative body.

Upon the presentation of the application, with the accompanying plan or map, as provided in § 65-7-103, it is made the duty of the county mayor to give ten (10) days' notice to each and every member of the county legislative body of the county mayor's county to assemble at the courthouse of the county, in order to take action on such application. If at such special meeting of the county legislative body a majority of the members in commission shall be of the opinion that an election should be held in the county to determine whether or not the county should make the subscription applied for, the legislative body shall so order.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 4; Shan., § 1561; Code 1932, § 2615; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-705.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, § 7.

65-7-106. City or town election on question — Order by governing body.

In like manner, upon the presentation of the application to the mayor or other chief executive officer of any incorporated city or town, accompanied by a declaration on the part of the company that its line of railroad shall be located and constructed within one (1) mile of such city or town, as provided in §§ 65-7-101 — 65-7-105, then it is made the duty of such mayor or chief executive officer to convene the board of mayor and aldermen, or other governing or representative body of such city or town, and submit such application for its consideration. Should a majority of the board of mayor and aldermen, or other governing or representative body of such city or town, be of the opinion that an election should be held in the same to determine whether or not such city or town should make the subscription, it shall so order.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 4; Shan., § 1562; Code 1932, § 2616; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-706.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, § 7.

65-7-107. Notice of election.

The election shall be advertised at least thirty (30) days beforehand, by notice published in a newspaper of the county, if there is one, or if not, posted at the different places of voting, specifying the time it is to be held, for what railroad, and the amount of stock proposed to be taken.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 6; Shan., § 1564; Code 1932, § 2618; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-707.

65-7-108. Conduct of election — Certificate of result — Validity.

The county election commission shall open and hold an election at every voting place established by law in such county, city, or town, and its certificate of the result of the election to the county legislative body, or to the proper authorities of such city or town, shall name, in writing, every established voting place at which an election was opened and held, and every one at which an election was not held. If it shall appear that the election was not opened and held in every voting place, then the election shall be declared null and void, and of no effect, unless it shall be made to appear, to the satisfaction of the county legislative body or city or town authorities, that the officer of elections was present at such voting place on the day and hour required by law, and did endeavor to procure judges and clerks to hold the election, and that the officer of elections was positively unable to do so, and the election at the precinct could not be held for the want of judges and clerks to hold it.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1907, ch. 436, § 1; Shan., § 1565; Code 1932, § 2619; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-708.

65-7-109. Election — Style of ballot.

At the election thus held, those voters who are in favor of the subscription shall put upon their tickets the words, “For subscription,” and those opposed, “No subscription”; provided, that in cities and towns where the Australian or Dortch ballot law applies, the ticket or ballot used in such election shall conform as near as may be to the style of the ballot prescribed by law. Such ballot shall be deemed legally sufficient if it has plainly printed thereon substantially the following: “Shall (name of county, city, or town) subscribe $ to the capital stock of the (name of railroad company) in accordance with the terms and conditions of the application of (name of railroad company) submitted to the (name of county, city, or town), on day of 20 ,” followed by the words “Yes” and “No” so that voters can intelligently vote their choices by making a cross mark (X) after the word “Yes” or “No.”

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 8; Shan., § 1566; Acts 1917, ch. 11, § 1; 1917, ch. 105, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 2620; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-709.

Cross-References. Form and arrangement on ballots, §§ 2-5-207, 2-5-208.

65-7-110. Action on return of commission.

It is the duty of the county legislative body, or governing body of such city or town, as the case may be, to convene on the call of its presiding officer, for the purpose of acting on the return of the county election commission, within ten (10) days after such election; and if it appears that the same was, in all respects, fair, and that three-fourths (¾) of the legal votes cast at such election were in favor of subscription, then it shall have full power, and shall proceed, to make and execute all necessary orders, and take such action as may be required to make the subscription effective according to the terms thereof and these provisions.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1907, ch. 436, § 1; Shan., § 1567; Code 1932, § 2621; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-710.

65-7-111. Second election.

Should any county, town, or city fail to vote the subscription to any railroad at any election held for the purpose, the county, city, or town may, in its discretion, at any time after thirty (30) days, order another election, if desired by the railroad company.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 10; Shan., § 1568; Code 1932, § 2622; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-711.

65-7-112. Subscriptions — Time of payment.

Such subscription of any county or incorporated city or town shall not become due and payable unless the railroad company shall have constructed and put in operation within the time fixed in the application, and substantially in the direction and on the line as shown in the plan or map, that portion of its railroad located within the county making the subscription, or that portion of its railroad located within the county in which is situated the incorporated city or town making the subscription, as the case may be; provided, that any county, incorporated city, or town making a subscription under these provisions, may, in addition to the restrictions imposed by this section, stipulate with the railroad company that its subscription shall not become due and payable until the company shall construct its road to such points, or for such distances, as may be agreed upon.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 11; Shan., § 1569; Code 1932, § 2623; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-712.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, §§ 5, 11.

65-7-113. Bond issue for payment.

When such subscription shall become due and payable, as provided in § 65-7-112, the county or city or town making the subscription shall make and execute its coupon bonds for the amount of such subscription, payable not more than twenty (20) years after date, and bearing interest at such rate as may be agreed upon, payable semiannually, and deliver the same to the railroad company; provided, that such county, city, or town may pay such subscription in cash at maturity, if it shall so elect.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 12; Shan., § 1570; Code 1932, § 2624; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-713.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, § 47-14-103.

65-7-114. Tax levy to meet bond payments.

When the subscription so made becomes due, as provided, it is made the duty of the county legislative body, or municipal authorities, as the case may be, on the receipt of the certificates of stock, as provided in § 65-7-116, to levy, from time to time, such taxes upon the taxable property, privileges, and persons liable by law to taxation within the county or corporate limits, as the case may be, as will be sufficient and necessary to meet the maturing interest on the bonds of such county, town, or city, and to provide for the payment of the principal; provided, that no tax to pay such subscription exceeding twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount subscribed shall be levied in any one (1) year.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 13; Shan., § 1571; Code 1932, § 2625; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-714.

65-7-115. Collection of tax.

The taxes prescribed in § 65-7-114 shall be levied and collected as other county, town, or corporation taxes, and paid into the treasury of the county, city or town as other taxes.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 14; Shan., § 1572; Code 1932, § 2626; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-715.

65-7-116. Issuance of stock.

The railroad company shall, when the subscription becomes due and payable, as prescribed, make out and deliver to the county, city, or town, as the case may be, certificates of its capital stock amounting to the subscription, and the certificates shall be held, owned, and voted by such county, city, or town as by other stockholders, and the certificates of stock, and dividends and profits thereon, and the public benefits derived from the construction and operation of the railroad, shall be in full consideration of such subscription and the benefits derived therefrom by the railroad company.

Acts 1887, ch. 3, § 15; Shan., § 1573; Code 1932, § 2627; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-716.